Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5497.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Legislative findings.
The general assembly hereby finds that:
(1) All babies and young children need responsive, consistent, nurturing relationships to
promote the development of positive mental health.
(2) In Rhode Island, the number of young children enrolled in Medicaid presenting with
Serious Emotional Disturbance grew from ten percent (10%) in 2017 to twenty-two percent (22%)
in 2024. Many young children are experiencing significant mental health challenges that interfere
with their development, relationships and learning.
(3) As of 2023, there were twenty-three (23) states and the District of Columbia that
actively promoted specific age-appropriate assessment frameworks and/or therapies through
Medicaid policy.
(4) Rhode Island’s Medicaid and commercial insurance providers already pay for mental
health services for young children, but the state has a very limited supply of therapists who have
specific training to work with the youngest children.
(5) Rhode Island has not developed adequate infrastructure to support the use of
recommended mental health assessment frameworks designed for young children or evidence-
based dyadic therapies for children under age six (6).
SECTION 2. Chapter 27-38.2 of the General Laws entitled "Insurance Coverage for Mental

Illness and Substance Use Disorders" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
27-38.2-7. Infant and early childhood mental health hub.
(a) The executive office of health and human services (EOHHS) shall develop a budget
and seek federal, philanthropic, or other funding to establish an early childhood mental health hub
program ("hub") focused on promoting and improving access to infant and early childhood mental
health services for children under the age of six (6) years and their families. The hub shall be funded
as a pilot program for a minimum of three (3) years to:
(1) Train and support infant and early childhood mental health professionals in Rhode
Island;
(2) Maintain a registry of infant and early childhood mental health professionals and their
qualifications;
(3) Monitor the availability of services, new national recommendations, and advancements
in interventions and therapies; and
(4) Make recommendations to Medicaid and behavioral health systems to address gaps.
(b) The hub shall be designed to integrate and align with the Rhode Island children’s
behavioral health system of care managed by the EOHHS.
(c) Needs that are outlined in the Rhode Island infant early childhood mental health plan
shall be early priorities for the hub including:
(1) Offering training and ongoing implementation support for clinicians to become certified
and to use evidence-based, family-based dyadic therapy models for children under the age of six
(6) years, such as child-parent psychotherapy (CPP), parent-child interaction therapy (PCIT), and
attachment and biobehavioral catch-up (ABC). Building the training capacity in the state by holding
train-the-trainer programs should be considered;
(2) Offering training and ongoing implementation support on developmentally-appropriate
screenings to identify mental health challenges in young children from infancy to under the age of
six (6) years;
(3) Offering training and ongoing implementation support for clinicians to conduct
developmentally-, culturally-, and family-appropriate assessments of mental health in young
children under the age of six (6) years;
(4) Advancing equitable access to services and reducing racial and ethnic disparities,
increasing the number of infant and early childhood qualified mental health clinicians who are
bilingual or represent the diverse races, ethnicities, and cultures of young children and families in
Rhode Island; and
(5) Serving as a community resource for families and health professionals to find a connect
LC001525 - Page 2 of 4

with effective therapeutic services for young children suffering with mental health challenges.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001525
========
LC001525 - Page 3 of 4